Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2003
Annual report; failure to file; effect.

Any association formed as provided by section 2-2001 failing to file the annual statement as provided in section 2-2002 shall cease to exist as such.

Laws 1949, c. 2, § 3, p. 58.